Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.196

Liability for contribution.

(1) A member is obligated to a limited liability company to perform any promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if the member is unable to perform because of death, disability, or any other reason. If a member does not make the required contribution of property or services, the member is obligated at the option of the limited liability company to contribute cash equal to that portion of the agreed value of the contribution that has not been made. This option is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other rights, including the right to specific performance, that the limited liability company may have against such member under the limited liability company agreement or applicable law.

(2) The obligation of a member to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of all the members. Notwithstanding the compromise, a creditor of a limited liability company who extends credit, after either the certificate of formation, limited liability company agreement or an amendment thereto, or records of the limited liability company reflect the obligation, and before the amendment of any thereof to reflect the compromise, may enforce the original obligation to the extent that, in extending credit, the creditor reasonably relied on the obligation of a member to make a contribution or return money or other property to the limited liability company. A conditional obligation of a member to make a contribution or return money or other property to a limited liability company may not be enforced unless the conditions of the obligation have been satisfied or waived as to or by such member. Conditional obligations include contributions payable upon a discretionary call of a limited liability company prior to the time the call occurs.

(3) A limited liability company agreement may provide that the interest of any member who fails to make any contribution that the member is obligated to make is subject to specified penalties for, or specified consequences of, such failure. Such penalty or consequence may take the form of reducing or eliminating the defaulting member's proportionate interest in a limited liability company, subordinating the member's limited liability company interest to that of nondefaulting members, a forced sale of the member's limited liability company interest, forfeiture of the member's limited liability company interest, the lending by other members of the amount necessary to meet the member's commitment, a fixing of the value of the member's limited liability company interest by appraisal or by formula and redemption or sale of the member's limited liability company interest at such value, or other penalty or consequence.

[ 2015 c 188 s 40.]